Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.070

Fiscal—Municipal Revenue Bond Act.

All provisions of chapter 35.41 RCW, the Municipal Revenue Bond Act, shall be applicable and/or available to code cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.070.]